District of Columbia statutes.
22-4233

Membership.

(a)

The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall include the following members:

(1)

Mayor, District of Columbia (Chair);

(2)

Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia;

(3)

Chairperson, Judiciary Committee, Council of the District of Columbia;

(4)

Chief Judge, Superior Court of the District of Columbia;

(5)

Chief, Metropolitan Police Department;

(6)

Director, District of Columbia Department of Corrections;

(7)

Attorney General for the District of Columbia;

(8)

Director, Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services;

(9)

Director, Public Defender Service;

(10)

Director, Pretrial Services Agency;

(11)

Director, Court Services and Offender Supervision Agency;

(12)

United States Attorney for the District of Columbia;

(13)

Repealed;

(14)

Director, Federal Bureau of Prisons;

(15)

Chair, United States Parole Commission; and

(16)

Repealed;

(17)

Repealed;

(18)

The United States Marshal, Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Repealed.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1504, 48 DCR 6981
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 106, 60 DCR 3390

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-1302.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel for the District of Columbia” in (a)(7); substituted “Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services” for “Department of Human Services’ Youth Rehabilitation Services” in (a)(8); repealed (a)(13), (a)(16), and (a)(17); added (a)(18) and made related changes; and repealed (b), which read: “Membership of the Authority members shall expire upon the dissolution of the Authority.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1404 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary amendment of (a) and repeal of (b), see § 106 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 106 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).